Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.280

Compensation and benefits limited by appropriation.

No compensation or benefits shall be paid or furnished to emergency workers or their dependents pursuant to the provisions of this chapter except from money appropriated for the purpose of this chapter.

[ 1984 c 38 s 29; 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 31; 1953 c 223 s 12.]